Nevada, session 83, SB245.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Advisory Council on Civics Education is
hereby created within the Department of Education. The Council
consists of:
(a) The Secretary of State or his or her designee;
(b) Two members who are appointed by the Governor, one of
whom is a representative of a business in this State and one of
whom is a representative of an industry in this State;
(c) Two members who are appointed by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction and who are employees of the Department;
(d) Two members who are appointed by the Executive Director
of the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement and who are staff
members of the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement or its
successor organization;
(e) One member who is appointed by the Chancellor of the
Nevada System of Higher Education;
(f) One member who is appointed by the Nevada Association of
School Administrators who is a principal of a public high school;
(g) One member who is appointed by the Clark County
Education Association and who is a teacher in a public high
school in an urban setting in southern Nevada; and
(h) One member who is appointed by the Nevada State
Education Association and who is a teacher in a public high
school in a rural setting or in northern Nevada.
2. After the initial terms, the term of each member of the
Council appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b) to (h), inclusive, of
subsection 1 is 2 years, and members shall serve at the pleasure of
their appointing authority.
-
*SB245_R1*

– 3 –
3. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Council
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment not
later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
4. The Council shall select from its members a Chair and a
Vice Chair who shall hold office for 1 year and who may be
reselected.
5. The Council shall meet at the call of the Chair as often as
necessary to perform its duties pursuant to section 3 of this act.
6. A majority of the members of the Council constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Council.
7. The members of the Council serve without compensation,
except that each member is entitled to receive the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally while engaged in the official business of the
Council.
8. A member of the Council who is an officer or employee of
this State or a political subdivision of this State must be relieved
from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to
prepare for and attend meetings of the Council and perform any
work necessary to carry out the duties of the Council in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or political subdivision
of this State shall not require an officer or employee who is a
member of the Council to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry
out his or her duties as a member of the Council; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
Sec. 3. The Advisory Council on Civics Education created by
section 2 of this act shall:
1. Assist the Superintendent of Public Instruction with the
development and implementation of the State Seal of Civics
Program established pursuant to NRS 388.5933.
2. Develop a process by which pupils may apply to receive the
State Seal of Civics.
3. Review applications submitted pursuant to subsection 2
and recommend qualifying pupils to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction for receipt of the State Seal of Civics.
4. Develop a rubric and set forth a satisfactory score to
determine if a pupil meets the requirements for a satisfactory score
in citizenship for the purposes of NRS 388.5935.
5. Set forth the requirements for completing a service
learning project for the purposes of NRS 388.5935.
-
*SB245_R1*

– 4 –
6. Set forth the criteria to earn a designation as a Nevada
School of Civic Excellence, a Student Civic Leader or an Educator
Civic Leader.
7. Set forth the criteria for distributing any gifts, grants of
donations for the support of the State Seal of Civics Program, if
any, to any schools that provide civics programs pursuant to NRS
388.5933, 388.5935 and 388.5937 and sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 4. NRS 388.5933 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.5933 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall ,
in cooperation with the Advisory Council on Civics Education
created by section 2 of this act, establish a State Seal of Civics
Program to recognize pupils who graduate from a public high
school, including, without limitation, a charter school and a
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, who have attained a
high level of proficiency in civics.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall [:] , in
cooperation with the Advisory Council on Civics Education:
(a) Create a State Seal of Civics that may be affixed to the
diploma and noted on the transcript of a pupil to recognize that the
pupil has met the requirements of NRS 388.5935; and
(b) Deliver the State Seal of Civics to each school district,
charter school and university school for profoundly gifted pupils
that participates in the State Seal of Civics Program.
3. Any school district, charter school and university school for
profoundly gifted pupils may participate in the State Seal of Civics
Program by notifying the Superintendent of Public Instruction and
the Advisory Council on Civics Education of its intent to
participate in the Program.
4. Each board of trustees of a school district and governing
body of a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils that participates in the State Seal of Civics Program shall:
(a) Identify the pupils who have met the requirements to be
awarded the State Seal of Civics; and
(b) Affix the State Seal of Civics to the diploma and note the
receipt of the State Seal of Civics on the transcript of each pupil
who meets those requirements.
5. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may :
(a) Apply for any available grants and accept any gifts, grants
or donations for the support of the State Seal of Civics Program
and its activities pursuant to NRS 388.5933, 388.5935 and
388.5937 and sections 2 and 3 of this act.
(b) In consultation with the Advisory Council on Civics
Education, adopt regulations as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section and NRS 388.5935.
-
*SB245_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 5. NRS 388.5935 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.5935 [1.] A school district, charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils that participates in the State Seal
of Civics Program established pursuant to NRS 388.5933 must
award a pupil, upon graduation from high school, a high school
diploma with a State Seal of Civics if the pupil:
[(a)] 1. Earns at least a [3.25] 3.0 grade point average on a 4.0
grading scale [or, if a different grading scale is used, a 3.85
weighted grade point average on a] or any grading scale approved
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
[(b)] 2. Demonstrates proficiency in civics by earning:
[(1)] (a) At least 3 credits in social studies;
[(2)] (b) A score of at least [90] 80 percent on the
examination for civics required pursuant to NRS 389.009; and
[(3)] (c) A satisfactory score in citizenship.
[(c)] 3. Completes a service learning project.
[2. The Department shall develop a rubric and set forth a
satisfactory score to determine if a pupil meets the requirements for
a satisfactory score in citizenship for the purposes of subparagraph
(3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
3. The Department shall provide guidance to public schools
regarding the requirements for completing a service learning project
for the purposes of paragraph (c) of subsection 1.]
Sec. 6. NRS 388.5937 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.5937 [1.] The Superintendent of Public Instruction may
designate:
[(a)] 1. A school district, charter school or university school
for profoundly gifted pupils as a Nevada School of Civic
Excellence;
[(b)] 2. A pupil as a Student Civic Leader; or
[(c)] 3. A teacher or other school employee as an Educator
Civic Leader.
[2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt
regulations that set forth the criteria to earn a designation pursuant
to subsection 1.]
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement the sum
of $20,000 to raise awareness of civics education programs,
including, without limitation, creating an Internet website containing
information about civics education programs, distributing brochures
and educational materials on civics education programs to students,
teachers, school administrators and parents or guardians of students
and creating awards in areas of civics education.
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement agrees to:
-
*SB245_R1*

– 6 –
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Center for Civic Engagement through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Nevada Center
for Civic Engagement through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Nevada Center for Civic Engagement, regardless
of their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems
necessary to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated
by subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 8. Upon appointment of the members of the Advisory
Council on Civics Education pursuant to section 2 of this act, the
members shall draw lots to stagger the terms of the initial members
so that:
1. Five members of the Advisory Council serve an initial term
of 1 year; and
2. Five members of the Advisory Council serve an initial term
of 2 years.
Sec. 9. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 7 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, and section 8 of this act become
effective on October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB245_R1*